src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
* **+Sem/Act** = Activity; cleaning, work, occupation, project, photosynthesis
* **+Sem/Adr** = Webadr
* **+Sem/Amount** = Amount; pile, amount of lynx, amount of food, one fifteenth, ten percent
* **+Sem/Ani** = Animate; dog, reindeer, teddy bear,ndragon, lice
* **+Sem/Ani-fish** = Fish
* **+Sem/Aniprod** = Animal Product; sweat, reindeer skin, lice egg, blood for making dumplings, pee
* **+Sem/Body** = Bodypart; ear, bone, ear canal, artificial leg, mustache, nervous system
* **+Sem/Body-abstr** = Non-physical body part; Sjel, ånd, reason, soul, voice, eyesight, conscience
* **+Sem/Build** = Building; house, museum, Sámi tent, nest, sandcastle
* **+Sem/Build-room** = Room in a building, typically place to be
* **+Sem/Buildpart** = Part of building; closet, room, door, balcony, pool, office
* **+Sem/Cat** = Category; name, subjunction, suffix, password, existential sentence
* **+Sem/Clth** = Clothes/Clothing; shirt, hat, theater costume, shawl, seatbelt, diaper
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl** = Jewelery and similar; watch, sunglasses, ring, necklace, crown
* **+Sem/Clthpart** = Part of clothes; knapp, søm, pocket (OBS! Ctain-abstr), bottom part of an article of clothing, upper part of trousers, seam, button
* **+Sem/Ctain** = Container; suitcase, terrarium, closet, container, gas tank
* **+Sem/Ctain-abstr** = Abstract container; bank account, fund, account, loan fund, pot, bank account
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth** = Eks; lomme/pocket
* **+Sem/Curr** = Currency; not money, euro, US dollar, denar, Danish crown, currency
* **+Sem/Dance** = Dance; swing, rumba, ballet, belly dance, war dance
* **+Sem/Date** = Date
* **+Sem/Dir** = Direction; GPS course, stock exchange price, graph, tendency, starboard
* **+Sem/Domain** = Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions), anthropology, punk rock, biology, linguistics, medicine
* **+Sem/Drink** = Drink; tea, beer, UHT milk, soda, communion wine
* **+Sem/Dummytag** = Default tag for uncategorized nouns
* **+Sem/Edu** = Educational event; skiing high school skiing academy, course, music lesson, lesson, master
* **+Sem/Event** = Event; wedding, meeting, competition, election, festival
* **+Sem/Feat** = Feature; Árvu, age difference, homosexuality, femininity, identity, congruence
* **+Sem/Feat-measr** = Measurable feature; radius, diameter, volume, circumference, perimeter, frequency
* **+Sem/Feat-phys** = Physiological feature; size, color, height, shape, weight, horsepower
* **+Sem/Feat-psych** = Psychological feature; authority, nature, childishness, creativity, arrogance
* **+Sem/Fem** = Female name
* **+Sem/Food** = Food; bread, vegetarian food, flour, tobacco, salt
* **+Sem/Food-med** = Medicine; birth-control pill, asthma medicine, medicine, penicillin, vaccine
* **+Sem/Fruit** = Fruit and fruit-like edibles
* **+Sem/Furn** = Furniture; throne, chair, table, altar, trampoline
* **+Sem/Game** = Game; biŋgo bingo, TV game, flipper, paintball, chess
* **+Sem/Geom** = Geometrical object; triangle, triangle, tetrahedron, asymptote, star
* **+Sem/Group** = Animal or Human Group; family, herd, group, indigenous people, delegation
* **+Sem/Hum** = Human
* **+Sem/Hum-abstr** = Human abstract
* **+Sem/ID** = ID
* **+Sem/Ideol** = Ideology; nomadism, buddhism, feminism, christianity, fanaticism
* **+Sem/Lang** = Language; South Sámi, mother tongue, Maori, Yiddish, second language
* **+Sem/Mal** = Male name
* **+Sem/Mat** = Material for producing things; paper, steel, wood, leather, wool
* **+Sem/Measr** = Measure; unit of volume, quarter meter, hour, minus degree, wátta watt
* **+Sem/Money** = Has to do with money; wages, not Curr(ency), treasure, belongings, debt, food price, bill, pension
* **+Sem/Obj** = Object; thing, cup, thing, toy, painting
* **+Sem/Obj-catch** =
* **+Sem/Obj-clo** = Cloth; carpet, flag, curtain, silk sheets, napkin
* **+Sem/Obj-cogn** =
* **+Sem/Obj-el** = (Electrical) machine or apparatus; player, lamp, TV, radio, oven
* **+Sem/Obj-ling** = Object with something written on it
* **+Sem/Obj-play** = Play object
* **+Sem/Obj-rope** = flexible ropelike object; barbed wire, thread, rope, cable, dental floss
* **+Sem/Obj-surfc** = Surface object; blackboard, drawing paper, canvas, board (for playing board games), (money) bill
* **+Sem/Org** = Organisation; newspaper, supreme court, company, museum, administration
* **+Sem/Part** = Feature, part of something; half, part, percent, rest, tenth
* **+Sem/Perc-cogn** = Cloth
* **+Sem/Perc-emo** = Emotional perception; fear, feeling of identity, empathy, sadness, working motivation
* **+Sem/Perc-phys** = Physical perception; shoulder pain, gass smell, sleep (during the night), need of sleep, hunger
* **+Sem/Perc-psych** = Psychic perception
* **+Sem/Plant** = Plant; lichen, plant, cucumber, bluebell, poisonous mushroom
* **+Sem/Plantpart** = Plant part; twig, leaf, root, seed, pine trunk
* **+Sem/Play** = Play
* **+Sem/Plc** = Place; world, nature, airport, workplace, fireplace
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr** = Abstract place; bachelor level, job market, third place, Troms website, address
* **+Sem/Plc-elevate** = Elevated place; mountain, peak, mountain top, scree, volcano
* **+Sem/Plc-line** = Place limitations; national border, border, finish line, stop line, equator
* **+Sem/Plc-water** = Water; river, lake, polar sea, sea, well
* **+Sem/Pos** = Position (as in social position job); 50% position, presidency, fixed position, kindergarten place, role in society
* **+Sem/Process** = Process
* **+Sem/Prod** = Product
* **+Sem/Prod-audio** = Audio product; yoik, roar, Beatles song, Bible psalm, blues
* **+Sem/Prod-cogn** = Cognition product; thought, decision, knowledge, lack of understanding, requirement
* **+Sem/Prod-ling** = Linguistic product; message, question, agreement, translation, criticism
* **+Sem/Prod-vis** = Visual product; picture, film, TV series, documentary, art
* **+Sem/Rel** = Relation; relation, dependency, subordination, analogy, equivalence
* **+Sem/Route** = Route-like place; street, path, corridor, bridge, winter path
* **+Sem/Rule** = Rule or convention; cultural tradition, abortion law, EU rule, law of cosines, fair play
* **+Sem/Semcon** = Abstract semantic concept; result, objective, reason, alternative, case
* **+Sem/Sign** = Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation); ID number, ČSV letters, quotation mark, hieroglyph, symbol
* **+Sem/Sport** = Sport; table tennis, judo, motor cross, ice hockey, floorball
* **+Sem/State** = State; hurry, captivity, anarchy, biodiversity, chaos
* **+Sem/State-sick** = Illness; allergy, cold, autism, dementia, somnambulism
* **+Sem/Substnc** = Substance; Water, sand, air, smoke, carbohydrate, vitamin, dust
* **+Sem/Sur** = Surname
* **+Sem/Symbol** = Symbol
* **+Sem/Time** = Time; áigi time, April, half an hour, Tuesday, deadline
* **+Sem/Time-clock** = Time
* **+Sem/Tool** = Prototypical tool for repairing things; axe, knife, fire striker, plastic hammer, wrench
* **+Sem/Tool-catch** = Tool used for catching; artificial fly, fishing net for cod, fishing rod, lasso used in wintertime, mouse trap
* **+Sem/Tool-clean** = Tool used for cleaning; broom, vegetable brush, toothbrush, cleaning equipment
* **+Sem/Tool-it** = Tool used in IT/tool within IT; IT infrastructure, analyzer, searching function, computer program, browser
* **+Sem/Tool-measr** = Tool used for measuring; barometer, hourglass, ruler, spirit level, scale
* **+Sem/Tool-music** = Musical instrument; shaman drum, guitar, violin, musical instrument, jaw harp
* **+Sem/Tool-write** = Writing tool; colored pen, pencil, chalk, paintbrush, paint
* **+Sem/Txt** = Written document; paper, book, letter, e-mail, song
* **+Sem/Veh** = Vehicle; car, boat, sled, vehicle, draft reindeer, bicycle
* **+Sem/Wpn** = Weapon; rifle, bow, sword, arrow, war axe
* **+Sem/Wthr** = The Weather or the state of ground; cloudy weather, wind, driving conditions, night sunlight, rain shower
* **+Sem/Year** = Year

### Multiple Semantic tags:
